test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-steehl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - steehl u-stem lasi: # Noun - full paradigm
     steehl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: steehl
     steehl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: steehlu
     steehl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: steehlast
     steehl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: steehlain
     steehl+N+Ess+Indef: steehlan
     steehl+N+Par+Indef: steehlad
     steehl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [steehltaa, steehltää]
     steehl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: steehl
     steehl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: steehlai
     steehl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: steehlaid
     steehl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: steehlaid
     steehl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: steehlain
     steehl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: steehlaivuiʹm
     steehl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [steehlaitaa, steehlaitää]
